Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB964.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 53 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER DAPPLICATION OF INTERNATIONAL LAWSec.5351. Legislative declarations.5352. Definitions.5353. Application of this subchapter to other laws.5354. Application of international law restricted.5355. Violations and review.5356. Whistleblower protection.5357. Reporting of violations.5358. Construction.§ 5351. Legislative declarations.12345678910111213141516171819 The General Assembly declares as follows:(1) The Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania are the supreme law of this Commonwealth.(2) The rights and privileges guaranteed under the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania shall not be infringed or limited by the application or enforcement of any international law to the extent the application would violate rights guaranteed under the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania.§ 5352. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"International law." Legal codes, statutes or systems originating from outside the United States that are applied in judicial or administrative proceedings in this Commonwealth. The term shall not include:(1) Treaties to which the United States is a party under Article II, Section 2 of the Constitution of the United States.(2) Federal statutes implementing international agreements.(3) Recognition of judgments or awards under 9 U.S.C. (relating to arbitration), the Convention on the Recognition and Enforcement of Foreign Arbitral Awards of June 10, 1958, or other binding Federal law."Public policy." Fundamental principles and values, including due process, equal protection, freedom of religion, 20250SB0964PN1103 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 freedom of speech and other rights guaranteed under the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania.§ 5353. Application of this subchapter to other laws.This subchapter shall not affect the recognition or enforcement of judgments under:(1) The act of November 21, 1990 (P.L.559, No.139), known as the Uniform Foreign Money Judgment Recognition Act, unless such recognition or enforcement would violate constitutional rights or public policy.(2) (Reserved).§ 5354. Application of international law restricted.(a) Prohibition.--(1) A court, arbitrator, tribunal or administrative agency may not apply or enforce a provision of international law where the application of the law is found to directly and materially violate a clearly established right under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(2) If a provision of a contract or agreement calls for the application of international law and the enforcement of that international law would violate public policy, that provision shall be null and void to the extent of the conflict.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to:(1) Deny recognition to foreign or international judgments or arbitration awards otherwise enforceable under Federal or State law, unless they violate public policy.(2) Interfere with choice-of-law principles that do not 20250SB0964PN1103 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 result in constitutional violations.(3) Prohibit private parties from voluntarily subjecting themselves to foreign law in a personal or business context, so long as the choice does not infringe upon fundamental rights.§ 5355. Violations and review.A public officer, agency or administrative tribunal that knowingly and willfully applies a provision of international law in a manner that directly violates a person's constitutional rights may be subject to disciplinary review under applicable judicial or administrative procedures. A civil penalty may not be imposed unless gross negligence or willful misconduct is established by clear and convincing evidence.§ 5356. Whistleblower protection.(a) General protection.--An individual who, in good faith, reports a concern or complaint of this subchapter shall be protected from retaliation in the form of discharge, demotion, suspension, harassment or any form of discrimination in the terms and conditions of employment or professional status.(b) Retaliation penalties.--Any person who retaliates against a whistleblower for reporting a violation shall be liable for:(1) Actual damages, including reinstatement, back pay and compensatory damages.(2) A civil penalty not exceeding $10,000.(3) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.(c) Violations of this section.--A report of a violation of this section shall be submitted to the Office of Attorney General or other designated authority as established by the Department of State.20250SB0964PN1103 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 5357. Reporting of violations.The Office of Attorney General shall:(1) Establish and maintain a secure and anonymous reporting system for individuals to submit complaints or concerns related to violations of this subchapter, provided that the system shall not be used to undermine judicial independence, second-guess judicial decisions or substitute policy disagreement for legal error.(2) Review all complaints submitted and, where appropriate, initiate investigations or refer the matter to the appropriate oversight or enforcement agency.(3) By February 1 of each year, compile an annual report summarizing the number and nature of complaints received under this section, excluding personal identifying information.(4) Submit the report under paragraph (3) to:(i) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(ii) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(iii) The chair and minority chair of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate.(iv) The chair and minority chair of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives.(v) The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee.§ 5358. Construction.Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to conflict with the Constitution of the United States, Federal law or treaties duly ratified by the United States.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0964PN1103 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728